Washington statutes.
RCW 35.81.160

Exercise of community renewal project powers—Assignment of powers—Community renewal agency.

(1) When a municipality has made the finding prescribed in RCW 35.81.050 and has elected to have the community renewal project powers, as specified in RCW 35.81.150, exercised, such community renewal project powers may be assigned to a department or other officers of the municipality or to any existing public body corporate, or the legislative body of a municipality may create a community renewal agency in such municipality to be known as a public body corporate to which such powers may be assigned.

(2) If the community renewal agency is authorized to transact business and exercise powers under this chapter, the mayor, by and with the advice and consent of the local governing body, shall appoint a board of commissioners of the community renewal agency which shall consist of five commissioners. The initial membership shall consist of one commissioner appointed for one year, one for two years, one for three years, and two for four years; and each appointment thereafter shall be for four years, except that in the case of death, incapacity, removal, or resignation of a commissioner, the replacement may be appointed to serve the remainder of the commissioner's term.

(3) A commissioner shall receive no compensation for services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of his or her duties. Each commissioner shall hold office until a successor has been appointed and has qualified. A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the clerk of the municipality and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner.

The powers and responsibilities of a community renewal agency shall be exercised by the commissioners thereof. A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising the powers and responsibilities of the agency and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the agency upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present, unless in any case the bylaws shall require a larger number. Any persons may be appointed as commissioners if they reside within the municipality.

The community renewal agency or department or officers exercising community renewal project powers shall be staffed with the necessary technical experts and such other agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require. An agency authorized to transact business and exercise powers under this chapter shall file, with the local governing body, on or before March 31st of each year, a report of its activities for the preceding calendar year, which report shall include a complete financial statement setting forth its assets, liabilities, income, and operating expense as of the end of such calendar year. At the time of filing the report, the agency shall publish in a legal newspaper in the community a notice to the effect that such report has been filed with the municipality and that the report is available for inspection during business hours in the office of the clerk of the municipality and in the office of the agency.

(4) For inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office, a commissioner may be removed by the legislative body of the municipality.

[ 2002 c 218 s 18; 1965 c 7 s 35.81.160. Prior: 1957 c 42 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—Construction—2002 c 218: See notes following RCW 35.81.005.